Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2584.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 38-651, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-651. Expenditure of monies for health and accident insurance; definitions A. The department of administration may expend spend public monies appropriated for such that purpose to procure health and accident coverage for full-time officers and employees of this state and its departments and agencies.  The department of administration may adopt rules that provide that if an employee dies while the employee's surviving spouse's health insurance is in force, the surviving spouse is entitled to no not more than thirty-six months of extended coverage at one hundred two per cent percent of the group rates by paying the premiums. Except as provided by sections 38-1114 and 38-1141, no public monies may not be expended spent to pay all or any part of the premium of health insurance continued in force by the surviving spouse. The department of administration shall seek a variety of plans, including indemnity health insurance, hospital and medical service plans, dental plans and health maintenance organizations.  On a recommendation of the department of administration and the review of the joint legislative budget committee, the department of administration may self-insure for the purposes of this subsection. If the department of administration self-insures, the department may contract directly with preferred provider organizations, physician and hospital networks, indemnity health insurers, hospital and medical service plans, dental plans and health maintenance organizations.  If the department self-insures, the department shall provide that the self-insurance program include all health coverage benefits that are mandated pursuant to title 20. The self-insurance program shall include provisions to provide for the protection of the officers and employees, including grievance procedures for claim or treatment denials, creditable coverage determinations, dissatisfaction with care and access to care issues. The department of administration by rule shall designate and adopt performance standards, including cost competitiveness, utilization review issues, network development and access, conversion and implementation, report timeliness, quality outcomes and customer satisfaction for qualifying plans. The qualifying plans for which the standards are adopted include indemnity health insurance, hospital and medical service plans, closed panel medical and dental plans and health maintenance organizations, and for eligibility of officers and employees to participate in such plans. Any indemnity health insurance or hospital and medical service plan designated as a qualifying plan by the department of administration must be open for enrollment to all permanent full-time state employees, except that any plan established prior to June 6, 1977 may be continued as a separate plan. Any closed panel medical or dental plan or health maintenance organization designated as the qualifying plan by the department of administration must be open for enrollment to all permanent full-time state employees residing within the geographic area or area to be served by the plan or organization. Officers and employees may select coverage under the available options. B. The department of administration may expend spend public monies appropriated for such that purpose to procure health and accident coverage for the dependents of full-time officers and employees of this state and its departments and agencies. The department of administration shall seek a variety of plans, including indemnity health insurance, hospital and medical service plans, dental plans and health maintenance organizations.  On a recommendation of the department of administration and the review of the joint legislative budget committee, the department of administration may self-insure for the purposes of this subsection. If the department of administration self-insures, the department may contract directly with preferred provider organizations, physician and hospital networks, indemnity health insurers, hospital and medical service plans, dental plans and health maintenance organizations. If the department self-insures, the department shall provide that the self-insurance program include all health coverage benefits that are mandated pursuant to title 20.  The self-insurance program shall include provisions to provide for the protection of the officers and employees, including grievance procedures for claim or treatment denials, creditable coverage determinations, dissatisfaction with care and access to care issues. The department of administration by rule shall designate and adopt performance standards, including cost competitiveness, utilization review issues, network development and access, conversion and implementation, report timeliness, quality outcomes and customer satisfaction for qualifying plans. The qualifying plans for which the standards are adopted include indemnity health insurance, hospital and medical service plans, closed panel medical and dental plans and health maintenance organizations, and for eligibility of the dependents of officers and employees to participate in such plans. Any indemnity health insurance or hospital and medical service plan designated as a qualifying plan by the department of administration must be open for enrollment to all permanent full-time state employees, except that any plan established prior to June 6, 1977 may be continued as a separate plan. Any closed panel medical or dental plan or health maintenance organization designated as a qualifying plan by the department of administration must be open for enrollment to all permanent full-time state employees residing within the geographic area or area to be served by the plan or organization.  Officers and employees may select coverage under the available options. C. The department of administration may designate the Arizona health care cost containment system established by title 36, chapter 29 as a qualifying plan for the provision of health and accident coverage to full-time state officers and employees and their dependents. The Arizona health care cost containment system shall not be the exclusive qualifying plan for health and accident coverage for state officers and employees either on a statewide or regional basis. D. Except as provided in section 38-652, public monies expended spent pursuant to this section each month shall not exceed: 1. Five hundred dollars $500 multiplied by the number of officers and employees who receive individual coverage. 2. One thousand two hundred dollars $1,200 multiplied by the number of married couples if both members of the couple are either officers or employees and each receives individual coverage or family coverage. 3. One thousand two hundred dollars $1,200 multiplied by the number of officers or employees who receive family coverage if the spouses of the officers or employees are not officers or employees. E. Subsection D of this section: 1. Establishes a total maximum expenditure of public monies pursuant to this section. 2. Does not establish a minimum or maximum expenditure for each individual officer or employee. F. In order to ensure that an officer or employee does not suffer a financial penalty or receive a financial benefit based on the officer's or employee's age, gender or health status, the department of administration shall consider implementing the following: 1. Requests for proposals for health insurance that specify that the carrier's proposed premiums for each plan be based on the expected age, gender and health status of the entire pool of employees and officers and their family members enrolled in all qualifying plans and not on the age, gender or health status of the individuals expected to enroll in the particular plan for which the premium is proposed. 2. Recommendations from a legislatively established study group on risk adjustments relating to a system for reallocating premium revenues among the contracting qualifying plans to the extent necessary to adjust the revenues received by any carrier to reflect differences between the average age, gender and health status of the enrollees in that carrier's plan or plans and the average age, gender and health status of all enrollees in all qualifying plans. G. Each officer or employee shall certify on the initial application for family coverage that the officer or employee is not receiving more than the contribution for which eligible pursuant to subsection D of this section. Each officer or employee shall also provide the certification on any change of coverage or marital status. H. If a qualifying health maintenance organization is not available to an officer or employee within fifty miles of the officer's or employee's residence and the officer or employee is enrolled in a qualifying plan, the officer or employee shall be offered the opportunity to enroll with a health maintenance organization when the option becomes available. If a health maintenance organization is available within fifty miles and it is determined by the department of administration that there is an insufficient number of medical providers in the organization, the department may provide for a change in enrollment from plans designated by the director when additional medical providers join the organization. I. Notwithstanding subsection H of this section, officers and employees who enroll in a qualifying plan and reside outside the area of a qualifying health maintenance organization shall be offered the option to enroll with a qualified health maintenance organization offered through their provider under the same premiums as if they lived within the area boundaries of the qualified health maintenance organization, if: 1. All medical services are rendered and received at an office designated by the qualifying health maintenance organization or at a facility referred by the health maintenance organization. 2. All nonemergency or nonurgent travel, ambulatory and other expenses from the residence area of the officer or employee to the designated office of the qualifying health maintenance organization or the facility referred by the health maintenance organization are the responsibility of and at the expense of the officer or employee. 3. All emergency or urgent travel, ambulatory and other expenses from the residence area of the officer or employee to the designated office of the qualifying health maintenance organization or the facility referred by the health maintenance organization are paid pursuant to any agreement between the health maintenance organization and the officer or employee living outside the area of the qualifying health maintenance organization. J. The department of administration shall allow any school district in this state that meets the requirements of section 15-388, a charter school in this state that meets the requirements of section 15-187.01 or a city, town, county, community college district, special taxing district, authority or public entity organized pursuant to the laws of this state that meets the requirements of section 38-656 to participate in the health and accident coverage prescribed in this section, except that participation is only allowed in a health plan that is offered by the department and that is subject to title 20, chapter 1, article 1. A school district, a charter school, a city, a town, a county, a community college district, a special taxing district, an authority or any public entity organized pursuant to the laws of this state rather than this state shall pay directly to the benefits provider the premium for its employees. K. The department of administration shall determine the actual administrative and operational costs associated with school districts, charter schools, cities, towns, counties, community college districts, special taxing districts, authorities and public entities organized pursuant to the laws of this state participating in the state health and accident insurance coverage. These costs shall be allocated to each school district, charter school, city, town, county, community college district, special taxing district, authority and public entity organized pursuant to the laws of this state based on the total number of employees participating in the coverage. This subsection only applies to a health plan that is offered by the department and that is subject to title 20, chapter 1, article 1. L. Insurance providers contracting with this state shall separately maintain records that delineate claims and other expenses attributable to participation of a school district, charter school, city, town, county, community college district, special taxing district, authority and public entity organized pursuant to the laws of this state in the state health and accident insurance coverage and, by November 1 of each year, shall report to the department of administration the extent to which state costs are impacted by participation of school districts, charter schools, cities, towns, counties, community college districts, special taxing districts, authorities and public entities organized pursuant to the laws of this state in the state health and accident insurance coverage. By December 1 of each year, the director of the department of administration shall submit a report to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives detailing the information provided to the department by the insurance providers and including any recommendations for possible legislative action. M. Notwithstanding subsection J of this section, any school district in this state that meets the requirements of section 15-388, a charter school in this state that meets the requirements of section 15-187.01 or a city, town, county, community college district, special taxing district, authority or public entity organized pursuant to the laws of this state that meets the requirements of section 38-656 may apply to the department of administration to participate in the self-insurance program that is provided by this section pursuant to rules adopted by the department. A participating entity shall reimburse the department for all premiums and administrative or other insurance costs. The department shall actuarially prescribe the annual premium for each participating entity to reflect the actual cost of each participating entity. N. Any person that submits a bid to provide health and accident coverage pursuant to this section shall disclose any court or administrative judgments or orders issued against that person within the last ten years before the submittal. O. Public monies may not be spent to pay for genetic sequencing procedures that are performed with a device that is produced by any of the following: 1. A company that is domiciled in a foreign adversary. 2. A company that is owned or substantially controlled by a company that is domiciled in a foreign ADVERSARY. O. P. For the purposes of this section: , 1. "Company" means a for-profit sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, including a wholly owned subsidiary, majority owned subsidiary, parent company or affiliate of the entities or business associations, or a nonprofit organization. 2. "Dependent" means a spouse under the laws of this state, a child who is under twenty-six years of age or a child who was disabled had a disability before reaching nineteen years of age, who continues to be disabled have a disability under 42 United States Code section 1382c and for whom the employee had custody before reaching nineteen years of age. 3. "Domiciled" means either of the following: (a) The country in which a company is registered. (b) The location in which the company's affairs are primarily completed or where a majority of the ownership shares are held. 4. "Foreign adversary": (a) Means the People's Republic of China, Russia, Iran, North Korea, Cuba, Venezuela or Syria or the hong kong special administrative region. (b) Includes: (i) A country that is designated as a foreign adversary by the federal government. (ii) Any agent or entity under significant control of a foreign adversary. 5. "Genetic sequencing" means any method to determine the identity and order of nucleotide bases in the human genome. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 38-651.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-651.01. Group health and accident coverage for retired public employees and elected officials and their dependents; definitions A. The department of administration, by rule, shall adopt standards to establish group health and accident coverage for former employees who worked for this state and who opt on retirement to enroll or continue enrollment in the group health and accident coverage for active employees working for this state, or with a disability, and receiving either income from a retirement program of this state or long-term disability income benefits pursuant to section 38-651.03 or chapter 5, article 2.1 of this title and their dependents and to establish eligibility for retired state employees or state employees with a disability to participate in the coverage. The department of administration may adopt rules that provide that if a retired insured or insured person with a disability dies before an insured surviving dependent, the insured surviving dependent is entitled to extended coverage at group rates if the insured surviving dependent elects to continue in the coverage within six months of the death of the retired insured or insured  person with a disability and the insured surviving dependent agrees to pay the cost of the premium for group health and accident insurance.  On notification of the death, the department of administration shall immediately notify an insured surviving dependent of the provisions of this section. The department of administration may enter into agreements with former state employees with a disability and their dependents who elect to obtain the coverage provided by this section.  The agreements may include provisions for the payment of amounts sufficient to pay for the premium and administrative expense of providing the coverage. The department of administration may adopt rules that provide that on the death of a state employee who at the time of death was eligible for normal retirement pursuant to section 38-757 under the Arizona state retirement system, the insured surviving spouse and eligible dependent children are entitled to continue coverage under group rates provided that the deceased insured state employee, spouse and dependent children were insured at the time of the employee's death. The insured surviving spouse shall be charged an amount sufficient to pay the full premium for the coverage. B. The department of administration, by rule, may adopt standards to establish group health and accident coverage for former elected officials of this state or its political subdivisions and their dependents and to establish eligibility for former elected officials to participate in the coverage. Qualifications for eligibility shall include that the former elected official has at least five years of credited service in the elected officials' retirement plan pursuant to chapter 5 of this title, had been covered under a group health or group health and accident plan while serving as an elected official and had been serving as an elected official on or after January 1, 1983. The department of administration may adopt rules that provide that on the death of an elected official or insured former elected official, the insured surviving spouse is entitled to coverage at group rates provided that the deceased insured former elected official met or would have met the qualifications for eligibility pursuant to this subsection or that the deceased elected official would have met the qualifications for eligibility had the deceased not been in office at the time of death. Except as provided in subsection J of this section, the insured former elected official or the insured surviving spouse shall be charged amounts that are sufficient to pay for the premium and state administrative expense of providing coverage. Notwithstanding subsection J of this section, the standards shall provide that all or any portion of the former state employees or former elected officials or their dependents shall be grouped with officers and employees of this state and its departments and agencies or their dependents as necessary to obtain health and accident coverage at favorable rates. C. The Arizona state retirement system board may enter into agreements with state employee members of the system and plan who are retired or who have a disability, retired members of the elected officials' defined contribution retirement system established pursuant to chapter 5, article 3.1 of this title and retired participants of the public safety personnel defined contribution retirement plan established pursuant to chapter 5, article 4.1 of this title who elect to obtain the coverage provided pursuant to subsection A of this section. The agreements may include provision for the deduction from the retirement benefits of participants of a retirement program of this state who elect to obtain coverage of amounts sufficient to pay for the premium not covered under retirement benefits and state administrative expense of providing coverage. D. Retired state employee members or state employee members with a disability of the public safety personnel retirement system, the public safety personnel defined contribution retirement plan established pursuant to chapter 5, article 4.1 of this title, the elected officials' retirement plan, the elected officials' defined contribution retirement system established pursuant to chapter 5, article 3.1 of this title, the corrections officer retirement plan or the optional retirement programs authorized pursuant to section 15-1628 who opt on retirement to enroll or continue enrollment in the group health and accident coverage for active employees working for this state and their dependents and who are receiving benefits from the public safety personnel retirement system, the public safety personnel defined contribution retirement plan established pursuant to chapter 5, article 4.1 of this title, the elected officials' retirement plan, the elected officials' defined contribution retirement system established pursuant to chapter 5, article 3.1 of this title, the corrections officer retirement plan or the optional retirement programs authorized pursuant to section 15-1628 may participate in group health and accident coverage provided pursuant to this section. The department of administration shall adopt rules that are necessary for the implementation of this subsection. E. The board of trustees of the public safety personnel retirement system may enter into agreements with retired state employee members and their dependents who elect to obtain the coverage provided pursuant to this section. The agreements may include provision for the deduction from the retirement benefits of participants of a retirement program of this state who elect to obtain coverage of amounts sufficient to pay for the premium not covered under retirement benefits and state administrative expense of providing coverage. F. The board of trustees of the public safety personnel retirement system may enter into agreements with retired judges and retired elected officials and their dependents who elect to obtain the coverage provided pursuant to this section. The agreements may include provision for the deduction from the retirement benefits of participants of a retirement program of this state who elect to obtain coverage of amounts sufficient to pay for the premium not covered under retirement benefits and state administrative expense of providing coverage. G. The board of trustees of the public safety personnel retirement system may contract with an insurance carrier and adopt standards to establish a group health and accident insurance coverage program for retired members of the public safety personnel retirement system, their dependents and their spouses. Any members or spouses who elect to obtain the group health and accident coverage provided under this subsection shall agree to a deduction from their monthly retirement benefits of an amount sufficient to pay for the premium not covered under retirement benefits and the administrative expense of providing coverage. H. A county board of supervisors may enter into agreements to establish group health and accident coverage for retired county employees or county employees with a disability and their dependents who elect to obtain the coverage provided pursuant to section 11-263, subsection B.  The agreements may include provision for the deduction from the retirement benefits of participants of a retirement program of this state who elect to obtain the coverage of amounts sufficient to pay for the premium not covered under retirement benefits and the administrative expense of providing for the coverage. I. Nonmedicare eligible retirees who live in this state, who enroll in a qualifying plan under this section and who reside outside the area of a qualifying health maintenance organization shall be offered the option to enroll with a qualified health maintenance organization offered through their provider under the same premiums as if they lived within the area boundaries of the qualified health maintenance organization provided that: 1. All medical services are rendered and received at an office designated by the qualifying health maintenance organization or at a facility referred by the health maintenance organization. 2. All nonemergency or nonurgent travel, ambulatory and other expenses from the residence area of the retiree to the designated office of the qualifying health maintenance organization or the facility referred by the health maintenance organization are the responsibility of and at the expense of the retiree. 3. All emergency or urgent travel, ambulatory and other expenses from the residence area of the retiree to the designated office of the qualifying health maintenance organization or the facility referred by the health maintenance organization shall be paid pursuant to any agreement between the health maintenance organization and the retiree living outside the area of the qualifying health maintenance organization. J. Public funds monies shall not be expended spent to pay all or any part of the premium of insurance pursuant to this section except for monies authorized to be paid for any insured from the retirement plan from which the insured is receiving benefits. K. A retired member of the elected officials' defined contribution retirement system established pursuant to chapter 5, article 3.1 of this title may elect to obtain the coverage provided pursuant to subsection A of this section, but shall pay the premium for the coverage selected and is not eligible for benefits pursuant to section 38-783 or 38-817. L. A retired participant of the public safety personnel defined contribution retirement plan established pursuant to chapter 5, article 4.1 of this title may elect to obtain the coverage provided pursuant to subsection A of this section, but shall pay the premium for the coverage selected.  A retired participant that who makes an election pursuant to section 38-869 may be eligible for group health benefits as specified in section 38-869. M. Public monies may not be spent to pay for genetic sequencing procedures that are performed with a device that is produced by any of the following: 1. A company that is domiciled in a foreign adversary. 2. A company that is owned or substantially controlled by a company that is domiciled in a foreign ADVERSARY. N. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Company" means a for-profit sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, including a wholly owned subsidiary, majority owned subsidiary, parent company or affiliate of the entities or business associations or a nonprofit organization. 2. "Domiciled" means either of the following: (a) The country in which a company is registered. (b) The location in which the company's affairs are primarily completed or where a majority of the ownership shares are held. 3. "Foreign adversary": (a) Means the People's Republic of China, Russia, Iran, North Korea, Cuba, Venezuela or Syria or the hong kong special administrative region. (b) Includes: (i) A country that is designated as a foreign adversary by the federal government. (ii) Any agent or entity under significant control of a foreign adversary. 4. "Genetic sequencing" means any method to determine the identity and order of nucleotide bases in the human genome. END_STATUTE